src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-joqug_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - joʼug: # Noun 75 'eng /est jõgi/fin' - full paradigm
     joʼug+N+Sg+Nom: [joʼug, joug]
     joʼug+N+Sg+Gen: [joʼug, joug]
     joʼug+N+Sg+Par: [joʼugõ, jougõ]
     joʼug+N+Sg+Dat: [joʼugõn, jougõn]
     joʼug+N+Sg+Ins: [joʼugkõks, jougõks]
     joʼug+N+Sg+Ill: [joʼugõ, jougõ]
     joʼug+N+Sg+Ela: [joʼugstõ, jougstõ]
     joʼug+N+Pl+Nom: jougūd
     joʼug+N+Pl+Gen: jougūd
     joʼug+N+Pl+Par: jougīdi
     joʼug+N+Pl+Dat: jougūdõn
     joʼug+N+Pl+Ins: jougūdõks
     joʼug+N+Pl+Ill: [joʼugži, jougži]
     joʼug+N+Pl+Ela: [joʼugšti, jougšti]
